Massachusetts, session 194th, H3894.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding section 17 of chapter 138 of the General Laws or any other
general or special law to the contrary, the licensing authority of the town of Cohasset may grant
5 additional licenses for the sale of all alcoholic beverages to be drunk on the premises pursuant
to section 12 of said chapter 138. A license granted under this act shall be subject to all of said
chapter 138 except said section 17.
SECTION 2. If a license granted under this act is cancelled, revoked or no longer in use,
it shall be returned physically with all the legal rights, privileges and restrictions pertaining
thereto, to the licensing authority, which may then grant the license to a new applicant at the
same or a different location.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1